Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5805.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 71A.20.020 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 30 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(((1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the))The following residential habilitation centers are permanently established to provide services to persons with developmental disabilities: Lakeland Village, located at Medical Lake, Spokane county; Rainier School, located at Buckley, Pierce county; Yakima Valley School, located at Selah, Yakima county; and Fircrest School, located at Seattle, King county.(((2) The Yakima Valley School, located at Selah, Yakima county, shall cease to operate as a residential habilitation center when the conditions in RCW 71A.20.180(2)(b) are met.))Sec. 2. RCW 71A.20.180 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 19 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(((a))) The Yakima Valley School shall ((continue to)) operate as a residential habilitation center ((until such time that the census of permanent residents has reached eight persons. Upon such time as the facility closes to full residential care, the)). The facility ((must thereafter))may operate crisis stabilization beds and only so many respite service beds as the needs of the department-identified catchment area or as emergency placement needs require, subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose.(((b) As of October 19, 2017, no new long-term admissions are permitted.))(2) The department, within available funds:(a) Shall establish state-operated living alternatives, within funds specifically provided in the omnibus appropriations act, to provide community residential services to residential habilitation center residents transitioning to the community under chapter 30, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess. who prefer a state-operated living alternative. The department shall offer residential habilitation center employees opportunities to work in state-operated living alternatives as they are established;(b) May use existing supported living program capacity in the community for former residential habilitation center residents who prefer and choose a supported living program;(c) Shall establish up to eight state-staffed crisis stabilization beds and up to eight state-staffed respite beds based upon funding provided in the omnibus appropriations act and the geographic areas with the greatest need for those services;(d) Shall establish regional or mobile specialty services evenly distributed throughout the state, such as dental care, physical therapy, occupational therapy, and specialized nursing care, which can be made available to former residents of residential habilitation centers and, within available funds, other individuals with developmental disabilities residing in the community; and(e) Shall continue to provide respite services in residential habilitation centers and continue to develop respite care in the community.--- END ---